Illinois, session 104th, HB1372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Small 5Business Economic Incentive Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Section:7    "Economic incentive" means tax credits or other economic 8incentives appropriated by the State and awarded or 9distributed to businesses for the purpose of job creation, 10infrastructure improvements, or economic development.11    "Full-time employee" means an individual who works for a 12business for at least 30 hours a week or who renders any other 13standard of service generally accepted by industry custom or 14practice as full-time employment.15    "State agency" has the meaning given to that term in 16Section 1-7 of the State Auditing Act. 17    Section 10. Economic incentives; businesses with 50 or 18fewer employees. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 19at least 50% of the dollar value of all economic incentives 20awarded to businesses by the State or by any State agency on or 21after January 1, 2026 shall be awarded to businesses with 50 or 22fewer full-time employees. This Act shall not apply to any   HB1372- 2 -LRB104 03544 HLH 13567 b1economic incentives awarded prior to January 1, 2026, 2including, but not limited to, incentives awarded prior to 3January 1, 2026 but not distributed or used until after 4January 1, 2026.5    State agencies shall confirm in their annual reports 6whether or not they comply with the provisions of this Act and 7shall provide adequate data to support those representations.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 91, 2026.